Hawaii statutes.
§603-4 Other circuits; judges. The
circuit court of the fifth circuit shall consist of two judges, who shall be
styled as first and second judge, and each as a judge of the circuit court of
the fifth circuit. The circuit court of the second circuit shall consist of
four judges, who shall be styled as first, second, third, and fourth judge, and
each as a judge of the circuit court of the second circuit. The circuit court
of the third circuit shall consist of four judges, who shall be styled as
first, second, third, and fourth judge, and each as a judge of the circuit
court of the third circuit. [L 1892, c 57, pt of §30; RL 1925, §2240; RL 1935,
§3636; RL 1945, §9634; RL 1955, §215-4; am L 1957, c 259, §1; HRS §603-4; am L
1972, c 88, §3(b); am L 1976, c 56, §1; am L 1981, c 133, §1; am L 1982, c 214,
§2; am L 2000, c 53, §1; am L 2002, c 196, §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next